Virginia statutes. Title 6.2. Financial Institutions and Services.
Article 2. General Provisions.

§ 6.2-101.
Confidentiality of information.

Except as otherwise provided in this title or §

12.1-19

, the following shall not be disclosed by the Commission or any of its employees: (i) a report of examination of any person subject to this title, including any contents thereof; (ii) any information furnished to or obtained by the Bureau, the disclosure of which, in the opinion of the Commissioner, could endanger the safety and soundness of a bank, savings institution, or credit union; or (iii) any personal financial information furnished to, or obtained by the Bureau.

Any reports and information described in subsection A may be provided to:

Members and employees of the Commission in the performance of their duties;

In the case of an entity, directors and officers thereof and such other persons as may be authorized by resolution of the entity’s board of directors;

Such governmental officers, instrumentalities, or agencies as the Commissioner may determine, in his discretion, to be proper recipients of such reports or information;

Any persons pursuant to lawful process and, if necessary to protect the confidentiality of the reports and information, an appropriate protective order issued by or under the authority of any appropriate court;

Other persons pursuant to grand jury subpoenas; or

Any other persons with the consent of the person to whom the report or information pertains.

History.

1988, c. 555, § 6.1-1.1; 1991, c. 127; 2004, c. 165; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-101.1.
Certified mail; subsequent mail or notices may be sent by regular mail.

Whenever in this title the Commission is required to send any mail or notice by certified mail and such mail or notice is sent certified mail, return receipt requested, then any subsequent, identical mail or notice that is sent by the Commission may be sent by regular mail.

History.

2011, c. 566.

§ 6.2-102.
Use of funds collected under this title.

All fees assessed under any provision of this title and paid into the state treasury shall be deposited to a special fund designated “Financial Institutions Special Fund — State Corporation Commission,” and out of such special fund and the unexpended balance thereof shall be appropriated the sums necessary for the regulation, supervision, and examination of all entities subject to regulation under this title. The Commission shall have the authority to maintain a reasonable margin in the nature of a reserve in the Financial Institutions Special Fund for the expenses of operating the Bureau.

In order to provide additional funds for the operation of the Bureau, the Commission is authorized to increase the fees and assessments for the examination and supervision of banks, trust companies, savings institutions, industrial loan associations, credit unions, consumer finance licensees, mortgage lenders, and mortgage brokers by an amount not to exceed 50 percent of the fees and assessments provided for in §§

6.2-908

,

6.2-1033

,

6.2-1202

,

6.2-1310

,

6.2-1414

,

6.2-1532

, and

6.2-1612

.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-4; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-2; 1974, c. 183; 1987, cc. 556, 558; 1988, c. 303; 1993, cc. 419, 432; 1994, c. 312; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-103.
Financial institutions to furnish certain information to fiduciaries.

The provisions of this title and any other provisions of law notwithstanding, any financial institution subject to the provisions of this title shall make available to any fiduciary, upon request, all information concerning assets or liabilities in which his decedent or ward had or has any interest.

History.

1970, c. 270, § 6.1-2.1; 1976, c. 658; 1978, c. 683; 1983, c. 491; 1996, c. 16; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-103.1.
Financial institutions to furnish certain information as part of adult protective services investigation.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any financial institution subject to the provisions of this title shall cooperate in any investigation of alleged adult abuse, neglect, or exploitation conducted by a local department of social services pursuant to Chapter 16 (§

63.2-1600

et seq.) of Title 63.2 and shall make any financial records or information relevant to such investigation available to the local department upon request to the extent allowed under the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act (15 U.S.C. § 6801 et seq.) and 12 U.S.C. § 3403.

History.

2022, c. 743.

§ 6.2-104.
Directors to serve only one institution.

No officer or director of any financial institution, other than a consumer finance company or credit union domiciled in the Commonwealth, shall at the same time serve as an officer or director of any other financial institution unless both such institutions are within a single financial institution holding company.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A, the Commission, upon petition brought on behalf of an individual, may permit him to serve on the boards of more than one such institution if the Commission finds that the financial institutions are not in competition with each other or that one or both of the institutions might otherwise be denied capable management or direction from an individual residing in or employed in the locality served by an institution.

History.

1978, c. 683, § 6.1-2.7; 1979, c. 376; 1987, c. 556; 1989, c. 162; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-105.
Reclassification or conversion of banking institution shares.

As used in this section, unless the context requires otherwise:“Banking institution” means a corporation that is organized under the Virginia Stock Corporation Act (§

13.1-601

et seq.) and that is a (i) bank, (ii) savings institution, (iii) bank holding company as defined in 12 U.S.C. § 1841 or §

6.2-800

, (iv) savings and loan holding company, or (v) multiple or diversified savings and loan holding company as defined in 12 U.S.C. § 1467a.“Issuer” means a banking institution required to file periodic reports under § 13(a) or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C. § 78m or 78o(d)).

A banking institution may adopt an amendment to its articles of incorporation to reclassify or convert a portion of its issued and outstanding shares of common stock into a class or series of preferred stock for the purpose of ceasing to be, or avoiding the status of, an issuer, provided (i) such reclassification or conversion is authorized by the banking institution’s original or amended articles of incorporation and (ii) the reclassified or converted shares continue to be a part of the equity capital of the corporation.

A reclassification or conversion of shares pursuant to this section shall not be subject to the provisions of Article 15 (§

13.1-729

et seq.) of the Virginia Stock Corporation Act, notwithstanding that such shares are being reclassified or converted and other shares of the same class or series are not being reclassified or converted, if:

The board of directors of the banking institution has recommended to the shareholders approval of the amendment to reclassify or convert such shares;

The shareholders of the corporation approve the amendment;

All affected shares are reclassified or converted on the same terms; and

Articles of amendment are filed in accordance with §

13.1-710

.

History.

2009, cc. 253, 356, § 6.1-2.7:1; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-106.
Payment of civil penalties.

Civil penalties paid pursuant to this title, when collected, shall be paid by the Commission into the treasury of Virginia, in the manner provided for judgments collected as set forth in §

12.1-35

.

History.

2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-107.
Effect of contract provision requiring amendment or waiver to be in writing.

If any written contract to which a financial institution is a party contains a provision to the effect that no amendment or waiver of any terms or provisions thereof shall be valid unless such amendment or waiver is in writing, then any amendment or waiver of any terms or provisions of that contract by conduct, course of practice or dealing, or otherwise shall not apply to future rights and obligations under that contract unless it is in writing.

History.

2013, cc. 67, 142.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 16-601 Deed of Trust Note — Simple Form, et seq.